Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 1. Definitions for Chapter

§ 2001.
Definition.

The term “legislative body” of a municipality, as used in this chapter, shall mean the mayor and board of aldermen of a city, the selectboard of a town, and the president and trustees of an incorporated village.
The term “selectboard,” as used in this chapter, shall include the mayor and board of aldermen of a city and the president and trustees of an incorporated village.
The term “town” shall mean village or city.